Hawaii statutes.
§291-31 Tail lights on vehicles,
motorcycles and motor scooters. (a) From thirty minutes after sunset to
thirty minutes before sunrise, at any time while a vehicle, other than a
bicycle, motorcycle or motor scooter, is operated on any public highway, there
shall be displayed at the rear thereof at least two tail lights, spaced as far
apart as practicable, which shall display red lights visible not less than two
hundred feet from the rear thereof; provided that vehicles manufactured prior
to 1968 originally equipped with a single tail light assembly need only display
a single tail light; and where a registration number plate is required by law
to be carried on the rear thereof, the same shall be illuminated by a white
light in such manner that the registration number thereon can be plainly
distinguished at a distance of not less than fifty feet from the rear thereof.

(b) From thirty minutes after sunset to thirty
minutes before sunrise, at any time while a motorcycle or motor scooter is
operated on any public highway, there shall be displayed at the rear thereof, a
tail light which shall display a red light visible not less than two hundred
feet from the rear thereof; and if a registration number plate is required by
law to be carried on the rear of the motorcycle or motor scooter, the same
shall be illuminated by a white light in such manner that the registration
number thereon can be plainly distinguished at a distance of not less than
fifty feet from the rear thereof. [RL 1945, pt of §11707; RL 1955, §311-13; HRS
§291-31; am L 1984, c 125, §1]

Cross References

Bicycle lights, see §291C-147.

Moped lights, see §291C-200.

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next